Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 6 Abandonment by Towns

24-6-1.
Order of abandonment — Reversion of title — Notice.

Whenever, by the judgment of the town council of any town, a highway or driftway in the town, or any part of either, has ceased to be useful to the public, the town council of the town is authorized so to declare it by an order or decree that shall be final and conclusive; and, thereupon, the title of the land upon which the highway or driftway or part thereof existed shall revert to its owner and the town shall be no longer liable to repair the highway or driftway; provided, however, that the town council shall cause a sign to be placed at each end of the highway or driftway, having thereon the words “Not a public highway,” and after the entry of the order or decree, shall also cause a notice thereof to be published in a newspaper of general circulation, printed in English, at least once each week for three (3) successive weeks in a newspaper circulated within the city or town and a further and personal notice shall be served upon every owner of land abutting upon that part of the highway or driftway that has been abandoned who is known to reside within this state. Nothing contained in this chapter shall, in any manner, affect any private right-of-way over the land so adjudged to be useless as a highway or driftway if the right had been acquired before the taking of the land for a highway or driftway. Provided, however, that the town of Coventry and any community with a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000), receiving a request for the abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value; and provided, further, that the town of North Providence, upon receiving a request for the abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner, at fair market value; and provided further, that the town of New Shoreham, upon receiving a request for the abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value; and provided, further, that the town of Barrington, upon receiving a request for the abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value; and provided, further, that the city of Cranston, upon receipt of a request for abandonment of a highway or driftway within the city of Cranston, where the sale of the highway or driftway to an abutting owner would result in the creation of a new lot that would be in compliance with the minimum-area requirement for construction of a building that is a permitted use, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value; and provided, further, that the city of Warwick, upon receiving a request for the abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value; and provided, further, that the town of Middletown, upon receiving a request for the abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value; and provided, further, that the town of Cumberland, upon receiving a request for abandonment of a highway or driftway from an abutting property owner, may sell the highway or driftway to the abutting owner at fair market value.

Provided, further, that nothing in this section shall apply to private ways regardless of their use or maintenance thereof by any municipal corporation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 30; P.L. 1903, ch. 1106, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

24-6-1

; P.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 667, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 57; P.L. 2007, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 194, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 195, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 37, § 1, effective June 8, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 38, § 1, effective June 8, 2022.

24-6-2.
Notice to abutting landowners of proposed abandonment.

Every town council, before proceeding to abandon any highway or driftway or any part thereof, shall give notice to the owners of the lands abutting upon any part of the highway or driftway within the town to appear, if they see fit, and be heard for or against the abandonment, and as to the damage, if any, which they will sustain thereby. Notice shall be given by advertisement once a week for three (3) successive weeks next prior to the meeting of the town council at which the abandonment is to be first considered, in some newspaper of general circulation within the city or town printed in English and a further and personal notice shall be served upon every person known to reside within this state who is an owner of land, abutting upon that part of the highway or driftway which it is proposed to abandon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1106, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

24-6-2

; P.L. 1967, ch. 214, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 74, § 1.

24-6-3.
Damages payable to abutting landowners.

The owners of land abutting upon a highway or driftway in any town shall be entitled, upon the abandonment of the highway or driftway, either wholly or in part, to receive compensation from the town for the damages, if any, sustained by them by reason of the abandonment; and the town council, whenever it abandons the whole or any part of a public highway or driftway, shall at the same time appraise and award the damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1106, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

24-6-3

.

24-6-4.
Jury trial on damages.

Any person aggrieved by the order or decree of a town council awarding damages on the abandoning of a highway or driftway, or any part thereof, may within one year after the making of the award apply by petition to the superior court for the county in which the land lies, setting forth the action of the town council and praying for an assessment of his or her damages against the town by a jury. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause twenty (20) days’ notice of the pendency thereof to be given to the town treasurer of the town by serving him or her with a certified copy thereof, and may proceed after the notice to the trial thereof, and the trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the damages sustained by the petitioner, and the amount thereof, and judgment shall be entered upon the verdict of the jury, and thereupon the petitioner shall be entitled to all the remedies conferred in and by §§

45-15-6

and

45-15-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1106, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1222; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

24-6-4

.

24-6-5.
Abandonment by non-use.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this chapter, when a public way of any kind in the town of Glocester has ceased to be used by the public and maintained by the town of Glocester for a period of twenty (20) years or more it shall be deemed abandoned and the abutting landowners shall not be entitled to recover damages against the city or town. Upon such abandonment the abutting landowners shall have a private right of access to their land along the abandoned way.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 511, § 1.